Maryland, session 2025, SB0383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
8–206.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “RANKED–CHOICE VOTING” MEANS A METHOD OF
CASTING AND TABULATING VOTES IN WHICH VOTERS RANK CANDIDATES IN ORDER
OF PREFERENCE AND VOTES ARE TABULATED IN A MANNER THAT REFLECTS VOTER
PREFERENCE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0383*

SENATE BILL 383
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE,
BEGINNING WITH THE 2028 STATEWIDE PRIMARY ELECTION, THE STATE BOARD
MAY USE RANKED–CHOICE VOTING TO CONDUCT A CONTEST FOR THE NOMINATION
BY A POLITICAL PARTY OF A CANDIDATE FOR THE OFFICE OF PRESIDENT OF THE
UNITED STATES.
(C) (1) IF THE STATE BOARD USES RANKED–CHOICE VOTING UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE BOARD SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP AND PAY THE COST OF A VOTER EDUCATION
CAMPAIGN TO INFORM VOTERS ABOUT RANKED–CHOICE VOTING;
(II) SHARE THE VOTER EDUCATION CAMPAIGN DEVELOPED
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH WITH THE LOCAL BOARDS; AND
(III) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT INCLUDES:
1. A REVIEW OF THE USE OF RANKED–CHOICE VOTING
DURING THE 2028 STATEWIDE PRIMARY ELECTION; AND
2. RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING THE
IMPLEMENTATION AND EXPANSION OF RANKED–CHOICE VOTING IN FUTURE
ELECTIONS.
(2) THE REPORT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE:
(I) DISTRIBUTED TO THE LOCAL BOARDS; AND
(II) POSTED ON THE STATE BOARD’S WEBSITE.
9–107.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “ELECTION–SUPPORTING TECHNOLOGY”
MEANS ANY EQUIPMENT OR TECHNOLOGY THAT IS DESIGNED FOR USE IN THE
ADMINISTRATION OF ELECTIONS, INCLUDING:
(I) ELECTRONIC POLLBOOKS;
(II) RISK–LIMITING AUDIT TOOLS; AND

SENATE BILL 383 3
(III) ANY SOFTWARE USED FOR PREPARING, PRESENTING, OR
REPORTING THE RESULTS PRODUCED BY A VOTING SYSTEM.
(2) “ELECTION–SUPPORTING TECHNOLOGY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
VOTING SYSTEM.
(B) THE STATE BOARD SHALL:
(1) ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(I) FOR THE REVIEW, CERTIFICATION, AND DECERTIFICATION
OF ELECTION–SUPPORTING TECHNOLOGY; AND
(II) RELATING TO REQUIREMENTS FOR ELECTION–SUPPORTING
TECHNOLOGY SELECTED AND CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) PERIODICALLY REVIEW AND EVALUATE ELECTION–SUPPORTING
TECHNOLOGY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.